District of Columbia statutes.
31-1372.01

Application of subchapter.

This subchapter shall apply to the investments and investment practices of life insurers subject to the provisions of this chapter pursuant to § 31-1371.01.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 201, 50 DCR 330